Washington statutes.
RCW 10.01.150

Charges arising from official acts of state officers or employees—Defense by attorney general.

Whenever a state officer or employee is charged with a criminal offense arising out of the performance of an official act which was fully in conformity with established written rules, policies, and guidelines of the state or state agency, the employing agency may request the attorney general to defend the officer or employee. If the agency finds, and the attorney general concurs, that the officer's or employee's conduct was fully in accordance with established written rules, policies, and guidelines of the state or a state agency and the act performed was within the scope of employment, then the request shall be granted and the costs of defense shall be paid by the requesting agency: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, If the agency head is the person charged, then approval must be obtained from both the attorney general and the state auditor. If the court finds that the officer or employee was performing an official act, or was within the scope of employment, and that his or her actions were in conformity with the established rules, regulations, policies, and guidelines of the state and the state agency, the cost of any monetary fine assessed shall be paid from the liability account.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1005; 1999 c 163 s 6; 1975 1st ex.s. c 144 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1999 c 163: See note following RCW 4.92.130.